District of Columbia statutes.
43-128

Court-ordered disinterment or disposal of ashes not affected.

Sections 43-101 to 43-114 , 43-116 to 43-118 , and 43-120 to 43-128 (except § 43-119) shall not be construed to:

(1)

Interfere with or prevent the disinterment of any body in accordance with § 11-2311 [repealed]; or

(2)

Interfere with the disposal of the ashes of bodies which have been cremated.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1298, ch. 854, § 686
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 534, ch. 1329, § 686
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(a), (b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 578, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 160(a)(2)
Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-34, § 29(c)(4), 28 DCR 3271
1981 Ed., § 27-128.
1973 Ed., § 27-128.